Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.130

Emergency purchases.

(1) An agency may make emergency purchases as defined in subsection (4) of this section. When an emergency purchase is made, the agency head shall submit written notification of the purchase within 10 business days of the purchase to the director. This notification must contain a description of the purchase, a description of the emergency and the circumstances leading up to the emergency, and an explanation of why the circumstances required an emergency purchase.

(2) Emergency contracts must be submitted to the department and made available for public inspection within 10 business days following the commencement of work or execution of the contract, whichever occurs first.

(3) The department may authorize exceptions to this section due to exigent circumstances.

(4) As used in this section, "emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the agency that either:

(a) Present a real, immediate, and extreme threat to the proper performance of essential functions; or

(b) May reasonably be expected to result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of life, if immediate action is not taken.

[ 2024 c 140 s 3; 2012 c 224 s 15.]